Wyoming, session 2025, SF0117.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 20-2-201(a)(intro), (d) and by
creating a new subsection (j) is amended to read:

20-2-201. Disposition and maintenance of children in
decree or order; access to records.

(a) Unless otherwise specified by an agreement
between the parties, in granting a divorce, separation or
SF0117

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0566
annulment of a marriage or upon the establishment of
paternity pursuant to W.S. 14-2-401 through 14-2-907, the
court may shall make by decree or order any disposition of
the children that appears most expedient and is in the best
interests of the children. In determining the best
interests of the child, the court shall consider, but is
not limited to, the following factors:

(d) The court shall order custody in well defined
terms to promote understanding and compliance by the
parties. In determining custody a court shall not favor or
disfavor any form of custody. Custody shall be crafted to
promote the best interests of the children., and may
include any combination of joint, shared or sole custody.
The court shall enter an order of shared custody unless:

(i) A different form of custody has been agreed
to in writing and signed by both parties;

(ii) One (1) or both parties has been adjudged
by a court to be guilty of a crime involving domestic
violence against the other party;

SF0117

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0566
(iii) One (1) or both parties have been adjudged
by a court to be guilty of cruelty, abuse, neglect or
mistreatment of the children;

(iv) The parties no longer reside within three
hundred (300) miles of each other and a different physical
custody arrangement is the only practical arrangement; or

(v) There is clear and convincing evidence that
a different physical custody arrangement is in the best
interest of the children.

(j) For purposes of this section:

(i) "Joint legal custody" means both parties
share the decision making rights, responsibilities and
authority related to the health, education and welfare of
the children;

(ii) "Joint physical custody" means the children
physically reside with each party for a substantially equal
amount of time each calendar year, with a parental plan
crafted to promote the best interests of the children;
SF0117

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0566

(iii) "Shared custody" means a child custody
arrangement that includes both joint legal custody and
joint physical custody.

Section 2. This act shall apply to all actions to
first establish custody of a child in a proceeding filed on
and after July 1, 2025.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0117